Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 1

General Provisions

62-6-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Contractors Licensing Act of 1994.”

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-601; Acts 1994, ch. 986, § 17.

Cross-References. Bond requirements, general home repair and improvements contractors, § 7-62-203.

Fire extinguishers and related equipment, title 62, ch. 32, part 2.

Fire protection sprinkler system contractors, title 62, ch. 32, part 1.

Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Unlicensed contractors, limit on building permits, § 7-62-202.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Independent Contractor § 2; 17 Tenn. Juris., Licenses, § 10.

Law Reviews.

Contracts and Sales Law in Tennessee: A Survey and Commentary, II. Contracts (John A. Sebert, Jr.), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 353.

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction over licensure of contractors on federal property, OAG 92-39, 1992 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (5/6/92).

Monetary limitations in Tennessee Contractor's Licensing Act, OAG 93-12, 1993 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (2/11/93).

Applicability of Contractor's Licensing Act to landscaping work, OAG 95-075, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 88 (7/10/95).

Proposed Electricians' Licensing Act of 1998 does not require union membership, OAG 98-050, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 50 (2/23/98).

Housing authority as municipal agency exempt from contractor licensing requirement, OAG 99-013, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 1 (1/25/99).

Constitutionality of exempting certain counties from contractor licensing statutes, OAG 99-112, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 112 (5/13/99).

Applicability of statutes pertaining to public purchasing and public contracting, and governing general contractors, to housing authorities established by municipalities or counties pursuant to T.C.A. §§ 13-20-101 et seq., OAG 05-170, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 172 (11/21/05).

62-6-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the state board for licensing contractors created pursuant to § 62-6-104;

“Commercial building contractors” are those contractors authorized to bid on and contract for every phase of the construction, direction, alteration, repair or demolition of any building or structure for use and occupancy by the general public;

“Contracting” means any person or entity that performs or causes to be performed any of the activities defined in subdivision (4)(A) or (7);

“Contractor” means any person or entity that undertakes to, attempts to or submits a price or bid or offers to construct, supervise, superintend, oversee, schedule, direct or in any manner assume charge of the construction, alteration, repair, improvement, movement, demolition, putting up, tearing down or furnishing labor to install material or equipment for any building, highway, road, railroad, sewer, grading, excavation, pipeline, public utility structure, project development, housing, housing development, improvement or any other construction undertaking for which the total cost is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more; provided, however, with respect to a licensed masonry contractor, such term means and includes the masonry portion of the construction project, the total cost of which exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), materials and labor;

“Contractor” includes, but is not limited to, a prime contractor, electrical contractor, electrical subcontractor, mechanical contractor, mechanical subcontractor, plumbing contractor and plumbing subcontractor, masonry contractor, and roofing subcontractor where the total cost of the roofing portion of the construction project is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more;

If the cost of a project exceeds twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), “contractor” also includes a construction manager of any kind, including, but not limited to, a residential construction manager, construction consultant, architect or engineer who conducts or provides any activity or service described in this subdivision (4) other than normal architectural and engineering services;

As used in subdivision (4)(A)(iii), “normal architectural and engineering services” means:

The preparation of bids, proposals, plans, specifications or other contract documents or the evaluation of contractors, subcontractors or suppliers;

The approval of shop drawings, submittals, substitutions, pay requests or other certifications required by contract documents;

Conducting representative reviews for progress and quality of construction on behalf of the owner;

Interpretations and clarifications of contract documents;

Preparation and approval of changes in construction; and

Preparation of as-built drawings and operation and maintenance manuals;

“Contractor” does not include an engineer licensed in accordance with chapter 2 of this title who is:

Managing and supervising the removal, remediation or clean up of pollutants or wastes from the environment;

Serving as a corrective action contractor, as defined by the rules and regulations of the department of environment and conservation;

Conducting subsurface investigation or testing, or both, by drilling or boring to determine subsurface conditions;

Conducting geophysical or chemical testing of soil, rock, ground water or residues; or

Installing of monitoring detection wells or piezometers for evaluating soil or ground water characteristics;

“Contractor” does not include:

Any undertaking, as described in former subdivision (3)(D)(i) [repealed] for the department of transportation; or

Subcontractors other than electrical subcontractors, licensed masonry contractors, and roofing subcontractors where the total cost of the roofing portion of the construction project is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more, mechanical subcontractors and plumbing subcontractors defined as a contractor pursuant to subdivision (4)(A);

No contractor shall be authorized to perform contracting work as a licensed masonry contractor unless the contractor is licensed as a masonry contractor in accordance with this part;

“Licensed masonry contractor” means a contractor who builds structures from individual units of brick, stone, or concrete and glass block laid in and bound together by mortar, where the total cost of the masonry portion of the construction project exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), materials and labor, and who is required to obtain a license as a licensed masonry contractor by the board;

“Limited licensed electrician” means any person or entity that performs any electrical work that has a total cost of less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) and that is required to be registered under § 68-102-150;

“Prime contractor” is one who contracts directly with the owner;

“Residential contractor” means one whose services are limited to construction, remodelling, repair or improvement of one (1), two (2), three (3) or four (4) family unit residences not exceeding three (3) stories in height and accessory use structures in connection with the residences; and

“Roofing work” means the act of removing, installing, repairing or otherwise maintaining any covering to any at- or above-grade structure for the purpose of providing weather proof protection or ornamental enhancement to such structure.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 2; 1977, ch. 101, § 1; 1977, ch. 406, § 1; 1980, ch. 652, § 3; 1981, ch. 399, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-602; Acts 1982, ch. 737, § 1; 1985, ch. 245, § 1; 1988, ch. 589, § 1; 1989, ch. 336, § 1; 1991, ch. 173, §§ 1-3; 1991, ch. 217, § 1; 1992, ch. 1020, §§ 1-18; 1993, ch. 147, § 1; 1994, ch. 986, § 1; 1998, ch. 645, § 1; 1998, ch. 764, § 1; 1999, ch. 238, §§ 1, 2; 1999, ch. 245, § 1; 2000, ch. 625, § 1; 2002, ch. 772, § 1; 2003, ch. 409, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 577, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 2; 2010, ch. 950, §§ 1-5; 2013, ch. 355, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 238, § 10, provided that the state fire marshal is hereby directed to notify by mail and by other means deemed to be reasonable all persons who are registered pursuant to § 68-102-150 on July 1, 1999. Such notification shall include the requirements of Acts 1999, ch. 238 pertaining to limited licensed electricians and the means for obtaining a license as a limited licensed electrician. Such notification shall also include a telephone number that persons needing additional information can call. Acts 1999, ch. 238 is codified in this section and §§ 62-6-103, 62-6-111, 62-6-120, 62-6-130 and 62-6-131.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2006, ch. 577, § 1 provided: “It is the intent of the general assembly that any contractor licensed under Chapter 409 of the Public Acts of 2003 to construct residences or dwellings in such person's county of residence shall continue to be licensed for such purposes as described in Chapter 409 of the Public Acts of 2003 unless such license is revoked, suspended, retired or not renewed for good cause. Any provision of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 62, Chapter 6, relative to renewal of contractors' licenses shall also be applicable to licenses granted pursuant to Chapter 409 of the Public Acts of 2003.” Acts 2003, ch. 409, § 2 rewrote § 62-6-102(3)(D)(i).

Former subdivision (3)(D)(i), referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2003, ch. 409, § 3, effective January 1, 2006.

Acts 2010, ch. 950, § 7 provided that the state board for licensing contractors shall charge a licensing fee in an amount sufficient to cover all costs associated with issuing a license to persons performing contracting services in this state as a licensed masonry contractor, as this term is defined in § 62-6-102.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Licenses, § 10.

Law Reviews.

The Exclusiveness of an Employee's Workers' Compensation Remedy Against His Employer (Joseph H. King, Jr.), 55 Tenn. L. Rev. 405 (1988).

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of exempting certain counties from contractor licensing statutes, OAG 99-112, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 112 (5/13/99).

62-6-103. License requirement — Recovery of expenses by unlicensed contractor.

Any person, firm or corporation engaged in contracting in this state shall be required to submit evidence of qualification to engage in contracting, and shall be licensed as provided in this part. It is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to engage in or offer to engage in contracting for any project in this state, unless, at the time of such engagement or offer to engage, the person, firm, or corporation has been duly licensed with a monetary limitation sufficient to allow the person, firm, or corporation to engage in or offer to engage in such contracting project under this chapter. The board for licensing contractors shall have the authority to grant or allow an exception, in an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%), to the monetary limitation of such license provided in this subdivision (a)(1). Any person, firm, or corporation engaged in contracting, including a person, firm, or corporation that engages in the construction of residences or dwellings constructed on private property for the purpose of resale, lease, rent, or any other similar purpose, shall be required to submit evidence of qualification to engage in contracting and shall be licensed. It is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to engage in, or offer to engage in, contracting as described in this subdivision (a)(1) unless the person, firm, or corporation has been duly licensed under this part.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), any person, firm or church that owns property and constructs on the property single residences, farm buildings or other buildings for individual use, and not for resale, lease, rent or other similar purpose, is exempt from the requirements of this part.

Except in counties with a population of not less than seven hundred seventy-seven thousand one hundred thirteen (777,113), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, a person or firm specified in subdivision (a)(2)(A) shall not make more than one (1) application for a permit to construct a single residence or shall not construct more than one (1) single residence within a period of two (2) years. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the person or firm intends to construct for the purpose of resale, lease, rent or any other similar purpose if more than one (1) application is made for a permit to construct a single residence or if more than one (1) single residence is constructed within a period of two (2) years. This subdivision (a)(2)(B) shall not be construed to alter the definition of “contractor” as defined in § 62-6-102.

Notwithstanding subdivisions (a)(1) and (2), the license requirements and restrictions contained in this subsection (a) shall not apply to single residences constructed by:

Nonprofit charitable or religious corporations, associations and organizations that are exempt from federal income taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)); or

Students enrolled in educational institutions who construct the residences under the direct supervision of faculty as part of the curriculum of the institution.

The exemption provisions of subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) concerning licensure shall apply to limited licensed electricians.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), any single residence homeowner is exempt from the limited licensed electrician requirements of this part for purposes of performing electrical work on the homeowner's own residence.

Any contractor required to be licensed under this part who is in violation of this part or the rules and regulations promulgated by the board shall not be permitted to recover any damages in any court other than actual documented expenses that can be shown by clear and convincing proof.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no lien otherwise authorized pursuant to title 66, chapter 11 shall be available to any person, firm, or corporation engaged in construction in violation of this chapter.

No contractor shall be authorized to perform roofing work on a construction project where the roofing portion of the construction project is twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more unless the contractor is licensed; provided:

Any person who holds a license issued by the department as either a manufactured home installer or a manufactured home retailer, pursuant to title 68, chapter 126, shall not be required to be a licensed contractor in order to perform roofing work on a manufactured home as defined in § 68-126-202; provided, that such work is related to the construction of a manufactured home or performed in connection with a manufacturer's warranty covering a manufactured home, or the repair of such home; and

Any person who holds a license issued by the department as to the manufacture or installation of modular building units, pursuant to title 68, chapter 126, shall not be required to be a licensed contractor in order to perform roofing work on a modular building unit as defined in § 68-126-303; provided, that such work is related to the construction or installation of a modular building unit, or performed in connection with a manufacturer's warranty covering a modular building unit, or the repair of such unit.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 3; 1977, ch. 9, § 1; 1979, ch. 59, § 7; 1980, ch. 652, § 5; T.C.A., § 62-603; Acts 1986, ch. 913, § 1; 1989, ch. 487, § 1; 1990, ch. 763, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 192, § 1; 1994, ch. 986, § 1; 1999, ch. 238, § 8; 2000, ch. 876, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 1; 2013, ch. 355, § 4; 2013, ch. 469, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 238, § 10, provided that the state fire marshal is hereby directed to notify by mail and by other means deemed to be reasonable all persons who are registered pursuant to § 68-102-150 on July 1, 1999. Such notification shall include the requirements of Acts 1999, ch. 238, pertaining to limited licensed electricians and the means for obtaining a license as a limited licensed electrician. Such notification shall also include a telephone number which persons needing additional information can call. Acts 1999, ch. 238, is codified in this section and §§ 62-6-102, 62-6-111, 62-6-120, 62-6-130 and 62-6-131.

Acts 2013, ch. 469, § 6 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2013, and to liens filed for construction performed on or after July 1, 2013.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Fire protection sprinkler system contractors, title 62, ch. 32, part 1.

Penalty for violations, § 62-6-120.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Licenses, § 10; 26 Tenn. Juris., Working Contracts, § 26.

Law Reviews.

Contracts and Sales Law in Tennessee: A Survey and Commentary, II. Contracts (John A. Sebert, Jr.), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 353.

Attorney General Opinions. Requirement of separate licensure for different construction classifications, OAG 98-020, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (1/15/98).

62-6-104. Board.

There is created a state board for licensing contractors, called the “board” in this part, to be appointed by the governor. The board shall be composed of nine (9) members, all of whom shall be residents of this state and at least three (3) of whom shall be actively engaged as residential contractors and shall compose the residential review board to consider and handle all informal conferences pertaining to residential construction, at least two (2) of whom shall be actively engaged as commercial building contractors, at least one (1) of whom shall be actively engaged as a mechanical contractor, at least one (1) of whom shall be actively engaged as an electrical contractor, at least one (1) of whom shall be actively engaged as a highway, railroad or airport contractor, and at least one (1) of whom shall be a person who is not engaged as a contractor in any county of this state and has no commercial or professional association with the residential contracting profession or industry, either directly or indirectly. All board members who are required to be in the business of contracting shall have been actively engaged in the business for a period of no less than ten (10) years immediately preceding their appointment and shall be licensed in the classification in which the member is serving upon the board. There shall be no more than one (1) board member in any specific classification provided in this subdivision (a)(1) residing within any one (1) grand division of this state and no more than three (3) board members residing in any one (1) grand division. In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

The governor shall appoint the residential contractor members from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested home builder groups including, but not limited to, the Home Builders Association of Tennessee, Inc. Appointments made pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2) shall be made by the governor following the expiration of the respective terms of the members serving on the board as of July 1, 2014. The governor shall consult with interested home builder groups to determine qualified persons to fill positions on the board.

Any member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year shall be removed as a member of the board.

The executive director of the board shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of any member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (b)(1).

All subsequent appointments of successor members shall be made by the governor at the expiration of the respective terms of the members in the way and manner provided by this part.

Notwithstanding § 3-6-304 or any other law to the contrary, and in addition to all other requirements for membership on the board:

Any person registered as a lobbyist pursuant to the registration requirements of title 3, chapter 6 who is subsequently appointed or otherwise named as a member of the board shall terminate all employment and business association as a lobbyist with any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the board, prior to serving as a member of the board. This subdivision (d)(1)(A) shall apply to all persons appointed or otherwise named to the board after July 1, 2010;

No person who is a member of the board shall be permitted to register or otherwise serve as a lobbyist pursuant to title 3, chapter 6 for any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the board during such person's period of service as a member of the board. This subdivision (d)(1)(B) shall apply to all persons appointed or otherwise named to the board after July 1, 2010, and to all persons serving on the board on such date who are not registered as lobbyists; and

No person who serves as a member of the board shall be employed as a lobbyist by any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the board for one (1) year following the date such person's service on the board ends. This subdivision (d)(1)(C) shall apply to persons serving on the board as of July 1, 2010, and to persons appointed to the board subsequent to such date.

A person who violates this subsection (d) shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in title 3, chapter 6.

The bureau of ethics and campaign finance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this subsection (d). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and in accordance with the procedure for initiating and proposing rules by the ethics commission to the bureau of ethics and campaign finance as prescribed in § 4-55-103.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 4; 1979, ch. 59, § 2; T.C.A., § 62-604; Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 30; 1994, ch. 986, § 1; 1998, ch. 944, § 1; 2008, ch. 861, § 1; 2010, ch. 1086, §§ 3, 4; 2014, ch. 604, § 3; 2020, ch. 556, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The state board for licensing contractors, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2026. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-247.

The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of regulatory boards in the department of commerce and insurance for purposes of administration, see §§ 4-3-1304, 56-1-301 — 56-1-306.

Acts 2008, ch. 861, § 2 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that the current member of the state board for licensing contractors who is not engaged as a contractor shall continue to serve on the board until the expiration of the member's current term of service.

Acts 2010, ch. 1086, § 5 provided that the provision of this act which prohibits persons who are not engaged as contractors in any county of this state from serving on the board due to such person having a direct or indirect association with the residential contracting profession shall apply to all member appointments made to the board after July 1, 2010.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote (b) which read: “(b) Any member of the board who fails to attend at least two thirds (2/3) of the regularly scheduled meetings of the board shall automatically be removed from the board and a successor member shall be appointed by the governor in the way and manner provided by this part.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 556, § 4. March 19, 2020.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Proposed Electricians' Licensing Act of 1998 does not require union membership, OAG 98-050, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 50 (2/23/98).

62-6-105. Qualification of members — Terms — Vacancies — Removal.

Each member of the board shall be at least twenty-five (25) years of age and of good moral character.

Each member shall be of recognized standing in the member's branch of the contracting business.

Subdivision (a)(2)(A) does not apply to the member who is not engaged in the business of contracting.

The terms of members shall be for a seven-year period and staggered so that the term of at least one (1) member shall expire each December 31.

In event of death, resignation or failure of a member to serve the full term, a successor shall be appointed to the unexpired term. Each member shall hold over after the expiration of the member's term until the successor has been duly appointed and qualified. If vacancies occur in the board for any cause, the vacancies shall be filled by appointment of the governor.

The governor may remove any member of the board for official misconduct, incompetency or willful neglect of duty.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 5; 1979, ch. 59, § 3; T.C.A., § 62-605.

Cross-References. Valid license required, § 62-6-106.

62-6-106. Certificate of appointment — License requirement — Legal assistance.

Each member of the board shall receive a certificate of appointment from the governor and, before entering upon the discharge of the duties of office, shall file with the secretary of state the constitutional oath of office.

No one shall be eligible for appointment on the board who does not at the time hold an unexpired license to operate as a contractor under this part.

Subdivision (b)(1) does not apply to the appointment of a member who by law is not permitted to be engaged in the business of contracting in any county of this state.

The board, or any committee of the board, shall be entitled to the services of the attorney general and reporter or the legal department of Tennessee in connection with the affairs of the board.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 6; 1979, ch. 59, § 4; T.C.A., § 62-606.

62-6-107. Executive director — Other staffing.

The board shall appoint an executive director to provide all administrative functions for the board. The compensation of the executive director shall be fixed by the board and the director shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

The board shall retain and establish the qualifications and compensation for investigators, inspectors, and other staff requiring professional qualifications. All members of the board's staff requiring professional qualifications shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

Any expenditure by the board under this section shall be subject to approval by the commissioner of finance and administration, pursuant to the board's annual budget submitted to the commissioner of commerce and insurance and approved by the commissioner of finance and administration.

Acts 1945, ch. 135, § 5; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7182.28 (Williams, § 7182.29); Acts 1972, ch. 633, § 2; 1978, ch. 906, § 20; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-607; Acts 1994, ch. 986, § 2; 2017, ch. 454, § 3.

62-6-108. Bylaws and rules — Seal.

The board has the power to make bylaws, rules and regulations not inconsistent with the laws of this state that it deems best, subject to the final approval of the commissioner of commerce and insurance.

The board shall adopt a seal for its own use. The seal shall have on it the words “Board for Licensing Contractors, State of Tennessee.” The executive director shall have care, charge and custody of the seal.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 9; T.C.A., § 62-609.

62-6-109. Board meetings — Officers.

The board shall meet at least six (6) times each year for the purpose of transacting business.

At the first meeting of each calendar year the board shall elect officers, including a chair, vice chair and secretary.

Special meetings of the board shall be held at times that the board may provide.

Five (5) members shall constitute a quorum at a board meeting.

Due notice of each meeting and the time and place of the meeting shall be given each member in the manner that the bylaws may provide.

The board shall meet in each grand division at least one (1) time each year.

The board may specify by rules and regulations specific board actions that may be taken by the executive director without a meeting of the board. The actions shall be limited to increases in the monetary limits and timely consideration of licensure applications or renewal applications for which there are no evident impediments to licensure and for which loss of substantial business is imminent if licensure is delayed. Notice of emergency actions shall be posted on the board's website and shall be scheduled as the first agenda item at the next scheduled meeting of the board in order that the board may review and, in its discretion, modify the actions of the executive director.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 10; 1979, ch. 59, § 8; T.C.A., § 62-610; Acts 1984, ch. 676, § 8; 1989, ch. 487, § 2; 1994, ch. 986, § 3; 2001, ch. 222, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 191, § 1.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Per diem and travel expenses of members, § 56-1-307.

62-6-110. Register of applicants — Roster of licensees.

The executive director shall keep a register of all applicants for license, showing for each applicant the date of application, name, qualifications, place of business, place of residence and whether license was granted or refused.

The books and register of the board shall be prima facie evidence of all matters recorded in the books and register.

A roster showing the name, business address, business telephone number and qualifying agent of each licensed contractor shall be prepared by the executive director of the board. The roster may be printed by the board, the expense of which shall be part of the expenses of the board as provided in § 56-1-302.

Acts 1976, ch. 822, § 11; 1980, ch. 652, § 1; T.C.A., § 62-611; Acts 1989, ch. 487, § 3; 1994, ch. 986, § 4; 2001, ch. 261, § 2.